Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Chapter 2

Self Defense

38-2-101. Lawful resistance — By whom made.

Lawful resistance to the commission of a public offense may be made by the party about to be injured, or by others.

Code 1858, § 4928; Shan., § 6889; Code 1932, § 11413; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Criminal Procedure, § 10; 14 Tenn. Juris., Homicide, § 29.

38-2-102. Resistance by party about to be injured.

Resistance sufficient to prevent the offense may be made by the party about to be injured to prevent an:

Offense against the party's person; or

Illegal attempt by force to take or injure property in the party's lawful possession.

Code 1858, § 4929; Shan., § 6890; Code 1932, § 11414; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 28.75, 28.71, 28.76.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Criminal Procedure, § 10.

Law Reviews.

Self-Defense — Duty to Retreat, 48 Tenn. L. Rev. 1000 (1981).

The Prevalence and Use of Criminal Defenses: A Preliminary Study (Neil P. Cohen, Michael G. Johnson, Tracy B. Henley), 60 Tenn. L. Rev. 957 (1993).

38-2-103. Resistance by others.

Any other person, in aid or defense of the person about to be injured, may make resistance sufficient to prevent the offense.

Code 1858, § 4930; Shan., § 6891; Code 1932, § 11415; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-103.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 28.74.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Criminal Procedure, § 10.

Law Reviews.

The Prevalence and Use of Criminal Defenses: A Preliminary Study (Neil P. Cohen, Michael G. Johnson, Tracy B. Henley), 60 Tenn. L. Rev. 957 (1993).